Massachusetts, session 194th, H2356.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 40A, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
(5) An inclusionary zoning ordinance or by-law that requires not more than 13 per cent of
units be affordable; provided, however, that such zoning ordinance or by-law shall not unduly
constrain the production of housing in the area impacted by the inclusionary zoning ordinance or
by-law; provided further, that such ordinance or by-law shall require a density bonus; and
provided further, that the executive office of housing and livable communities may issue
guidelines or promulgate regulations consistent with this paragraph.
of 1